Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-202
Memorials; erection; plans; publication; tax authorized; limitation.

The board of supervisors or commissioners of any county, the electors of any township at the annual or special township meeting, or the commissioners, council, or trustees of any city or village may by proper resolution, motion, or ordinance decide to erect or aid in the erection of any such statue, monument, or other memorial. Such resolution, motion, or ordinance shall specify the general features and plan of such statue, monument, or other memorial, the proposed location, the probable cost, and the amount thereof to be paid by such county, township, city, or village. The resolution, motion, or ordinance shall thereafter be published once in the official paper of the county, city, or village, and twenty days after the publication date of the publication, the proper authorities may levy a tax, in addition to the taxes otherwise authorized to be levied upon the taxable property of such county, township, city, or village, to pay the amount so to be paid by such county, township, city, or village, in like manner as general taxes are levied, or to pay such amount from the general fund. The levy shall be subject to sections 77-3442 and 77-3443.

Laws 1919, c. 254, § 2, p. 1031;

C.S.1922, § 6813;

C.S.1929, § 80-202;

R.S.1943, § 80-202;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 68;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 63;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 45.